tools/foma/english_morph.foma
### english_morph.foma — HCP English morphological analyzer ###
#
# Root-list grammar (proof of concept). Roots are curated from known
# clean sources, NOT from hcp_english. Root validation for the full
# cleanup pass will use an external clean wordlist.
#
# Analysis direction (flookup default, apply up):
#   surface form → base+tag
# Generation direction (flookup -i, apply down):
#   base+tag → surface form

define V     [ a | e | i | o | u ] ;
define DoubC [ b | d | f | g | m | n | p | r | t ] ;

read lexc english_morph.lexc
define Lexicon ;

! ---- Alternation rules (match inflection_rules table) ----

! Consonant doubling: CVC + ^V → double final consonant (run^ing → running)
define ConsonantDoubling DoubC -> DoubC DoubC || V _ "^" V ;

! Silent-e deletion before -ing / -ed (make^ing → making)
define EDeletion e -> 0 || _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ;

! e-insertion after sibilants before -s (watch^s → watches)
define EInsertion [..] -> e || [ s | z | x | c h | s h ] _ "^" s ;

! y-replacement: -y → -ie before ^s, -y → -i before ^ed/^ing/^er/^est
define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s ,, y -> i || _ "^" [ e d | n g | e r | e s t ] ;

! k-insertion: vowel+c + ^vowel (panic^ing → panicking)
define KInsertion [..] -> k || V c _ "^" V ;

! Remove morpheme boundary marker
define Cleanup "^" -> 0 ;

! Compose into final transducer
regex Lexicon
    .o. ConsonantDoubling
    .o. EDeletion
    .o. EInsertion
    .o. YReplacement
    .o. KInsertion
    .o. Cleanup ;

save stack english_morph.bin
